Colorado statutes. TITLE 2 Legislative
PART 4
DEFINITIONS

2-4-401. Definitions.

The following definitions apply to every statute, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Behavioral health" refers to an individual's mental and emotional well-being and actions that affect an individual's overall wellness. Behavioral health problems and disorders include substance use disorders, serious psychological distress, suicide, and other mental health disorders. Problems ranging from unhealthy stress or subclinical conditions to diagnosable and treatable diseases are included in the term "behavioral health". The term "behavioral health" is also used to describe service systems that encompass prevention and promotion of emotional health, prevention and treatment services for mental health and substance use disorders, and recovery support.

(1.1) "Child" includes child by adoption.

(1.3) "Civil union" means a relationship established by two eligible persons pursuant to the requirements of article 15 of title 14, C.R.S., that entitles them to receive the benefits and protections and be subject to the responsibilities of spouses.

(1.4) "Civil union certificate" means a document that certifies that the persons named in the certificate have established a civil union in this state in compliance with the provisions of article 15 of title 14, C.R.S.

(1.5) "Contraceptive" or "contraception" means a medically acceptable drug, device, or procedure used to prevent pregnancy.

"Court" means a court of record.

(2.5) Repealed.

"Executor" includes administrator and "administrator" includes executor.

(3.2) "Felony" includes a drug felony described in article 18 of title 18.

(3.4) "Gender expression" means an individual's way of reflecting and expressing the individual's gender to the outside world, typically demonstrated through appearance, dress, and behavior.

(3.5) "Gender identity" means an individual's innate sense of the individual's own gender, which may or may not correspond with the individual's sex assigned at birth.

(3.6) "Final disposition" means the disposition of human remains by entombment, burial, cremation, natural reduction, or removal from the state.

(3.7) "Immediate family member" means a person who is related by blood, marriage, civil union, or adoption.

"Issue", as applied to the descent of estate, includes all the lawful, lineal descendants of the ancestor.

"Land", "lands", or "real estate" includes lands, tenements, and hereditaments, and all rights thereto and all interests therein.

"Minor" means any person who has not attained the age of twenty-one years. No construction of this subsection (6) shall supersede the express language of any statute.

(6.3) "Misdemeanor" includes a drug misdemeanor described in article 18 of title 18, C.R.S.

(6.5) (a) "Must" means that a person or thing is required to meet a condition for a consequence to apply. "Must" does not mean that a person has a duty.

This subsection (6.5):

Is not intended to alter the interpretation of a statute enacted before August 7, 2013; and

Applies to statutes enacted on or after August 7, 2013, but only with regard to language that appears in small capital font in the session laws published pursuant to section 24-70-223, C.R.S.

(6.9) "Natural reduction" or "naturally reduce" means the contained, accelerated conversion of human remains to soil.

"Oath" includes affirmation, and "swear" includes affirm.

(7.5) "Partner in a civil union" or "party to a civil union" means a person who has entered into a civil union in accordance with the requirements of article 15 of title 14, C.R.S.

"Person" means any individual, corporation, government or governmental subdivision or agency, business trust, estate, trust, limited liability company, partnership, association, or other legal entity.

(8.5) Repealed.

"Personal representative" includes executor, administrator, conservator, or guardian.

(9.5) "Petty offense" includes a drug petty offense described in article 18 of title 18, C.R.S.

"Population" means that shown by the most recent regular or special federal census.

"Property" means both real and personal property.

"Registered mail" includes certified mail.

"Rule" includes regulation.

(13.5) "Sexual orientation" means an individual's identity, or another individual's perception thereof, in relation to the gender or genders to which the individual is sexually or emotionally attracted and the behavior or social affiliation that may result from the attraction.

(13.7) (a) "Shall" means that a person has a duty.

This subsection (13.7):

Is not intended to alter the interpretation of a statute enacted before August 7, 2013; and

Applies to statutes enacted on or after August 7, 2013, but only with regard to language that appears in small capital font in the session laws published pursuant to section 24-70-223, C.R.S.

"State", when applied to a part of the United States, includes any state, district, commonwealth, territory, insular possession thereof, and any area subject to the legislative authority of the United States of America.

"United States" includes all states, the District of Columbia, and the territories, commonwealths, and possessions of the United States.

"Will" includes a codicil.

"Written" or "in writing" includes any representation of words, letters, symbols, or figures; but this provision does not affect any law relating to signatures.

Source:

L. 73:

R&RE, p. 1426, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 135-1-401.

L. 80:

(2.5) added, p. 751, § 1.

L. 90:

(8) amended, p. 444, § 2, effective April 18.

L. 2008:

(13.5) added, p. 1598, § 9, effective May 29.

L. 2009:

(1.5) added, (SB 09-225), ch. 126, p. 546, § 1, effective August 5.

L. 2013:

(1.3), (1.4), (3.7), and (7.5) added, (SB 13-011), ch. 49, p. 157, § 5, effective May 1; (6.5) and (13.7) added, (HB 13-1029), ch. 8, p. 21, § 2, effective August 7; (3.5) added, (SB 13-250), ch. 333, p. 1942, § 65, effective October 1.

L. 2014:

(6.7) and (8.5) added, (SB 14-163), ch. 391, p. 1968, § 1, effective June 6.

L. 2015:

(8.5) repealed and (9.5) added, (SB 15-264), ch. 259, p. 940, § 3, effective August 5.

L. 2017:

(1) amended and (1.1) added, (SB 17-242), ch. 263, p. 1250, § 2, effective May 25.

L. 2021:

(3.6) and (6.9) added, (SB 21-006), ch. 123, p. 488, § 1, effective September 7; (3.2) and (3.4) added and (3.5) and (13.5) amended, (HB 21-1108), ch. 156, p. 889, § 9, effective September 7.

2-4-402. Colorado Revised Statutes.

Colorado Revised Statutes may be abbreviated and cited as "C.R.S.".

Source:

L. 73:

R&RE, p. 1426, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 135-1-402.

L. 83:

Entire section amended, p. 377, § 1, effective July 1.